tr: Çocuk koltuğu montaj tipi: Kargo bisikleti entegre bagajı; Gidon; MIK HD bagaj; Mandallı braket; Arka bagaj/taşıyıcı; Sele borusu; Sele borusu kelepçesi; Şaft borusu/gidon boğazı; Üst boru/orta kadro; Diğer
sl-SI: Vrsta pritrditve otroškega sedeža: Vgrajen prtljažnik za tovorno kolo; Krmilo; Prtljažnik MIK HD; Nosilec za hitro sprostitev; Zadnji prtljažnik/nosilec; Sedežna cev; Objemka sedežne opore; Krmilna cev / opora krmila; Zgornja cev / srednji okvir; Drugo
pt-BR: Tipo de montagem da cadeirinha infantil: Bagageiro integrado de bicicleta cargueira; Guidão; Bagageiro MIK HD; Suporte de liberação rápida; Bagageiro/suporte traseiro; Tubo do selim; Abraçadeira do canote; Espiga/mesa; Tubo superior/meio do quadro; Outro
ru: Тип крепления детского сиденья: Встроенный багажник грузового велосипеда; На руль; Багажник MIK HD; Быстросъемный кронштейн; Задний багажник/крепление; На подседельную трубу; Зажим подседельного штыря; На шток/вынос; На верхнюю трубу / середину рамы; Другое
fi: Lastenistuimen kiinnitystyyppi: Tavarapyörän integroitu tavarateline; Ohjaustanko; MIK HD -tavarateline; Pikakiinnike; Takatavarateline; Satulaputki; Satulatolpan kiristin; Ohjainputki/ohjainkannatin; Yläputki/keskirunko; Muu
lt-LT: Vaikiškos kėdutės montavimo tipas: Krovininio dviračio integruota bagažinė; Vairas; MIK HD bagažinė; Greitojo atleidimo laikiklis; Galinė bagažinė / laikiklis; Sėdynės vamzdis; Balnelio iškyšos spaustukas; Vairo kolonėlė / iškyša; Viršutinis vamzdis / rėmo vidurys; Kita
hu: Gyermekülés rögzítési típusa: Teherkerékpárba integrált csomagtartó; Kormány; MIK HD csomagtartó; Gyorszáras konzol; Hátsó csomagtartó; Nyeregcső; Nyeregcsőbilincs; Villanyak / Kormányszár; Felsőcső / Középső váz; Egyéb
vi: Loại lắp đặt ghế trẻ em: Giá đèo hàng xe đạp thồ tích hợp; Ghi-đông; Giá đèo hàng MIK HD; Giá đỡ tháo lắp nhanh; Giá đèo hàng/Baga sau; Ống yên; Kẹp cốt yên; Ống cổ/Pô tăng; Ống trên/giữa khung; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem da cadeira infantil: Porta-bagagens integrado para bicicleta de carga; Guiador; Porta-bagagens MIK HD; Suporte de libertação rápida; Porta-bagagens/transportador traseiro; Tubo de selim; Abraçadeira de espigão de selim; Tubo de direção/avanço; Tubo superior/centro do quadro; Outro
ko: 어린이용 시트 장착형: 카고 자전거 통합 랙; 핸들바; MIK HD 랙; 퀵 릴리스 브래킷; 리어 랙/캐리어; 시트 튜브; 시트포스트 클램프; 스티어러/스템; 탑 튜브/미드 프레임; 기타
zh-CN: 儿童座椅安装类型: 载货自行车一体式货架; 车把; MIK HD 货架; 快拆支架; 后货架; 立管; 座管夹; 舵管/把立; 上管/中段车架; 其他
ja: チャイルドシート取り付けタイプ: カーゴバイク一体型ラック; ハンドルバー; MIK HDラック; クイックリリースブラケット; リアラック/キャリア; シートチューブ; シートポストクランプ; コラム/ステム; トップチューブ/ミッドフレーム; その他
de: Befestigungsart des Kindersitzes: Integrierter Gepäckträger für Lastenräder; Lenker; MIK HD-Gepäckträger; Schnellspannhalterung; Gepäckträger hinten; Sitzrohr; Sattelstützenklemme; Gabelschaft/Vorbau; Oberrohr/Mittelrahmen; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на детска седалка: Интегриран багажник за карго велосипед; Кормило; MIK HD багажник; Скоба за бързо освобождаване; Заден багажник/носач; Седалкова тръба; Скоба за колчето на седалката; Стержен/лапа; Горна тръба/средна рамка; Други
fr: Type de montage du siège enfant: Porte-bagages intégré pour vélo cargo; Guidon; Porte-bagages MIK HD; Support à fixation rapide; Porte-bagages arrière; Tube de selle; Collier de tige de selle; Tube de direction/potence; Tube supérieur/milieu du cadre; Autre
zh-TW: 兒童座椅安裝類型: 載貨自行車整合式貨架; 把手; MIK HD 貨架; 快拆支架; 後貨架/托架; 立管; 座管束; 前叉豎管/龍頭; 上管/車架中段; 其他
sk-SK: Spôsob upevnenia detskej autosedačky: Integrovaný nosič nákladného bicykla; Riadidlá; Nosič MIK HD; Rýchloupínací držiak; Zadný nosič; Sedlová rúrka; Objímka sedlovky; Hlavová rúrka/predstavec; Horná rúrka/stred rámu; Iné
el: Τύπος τοποθέτησης παιδικού καθίσματος: Ενσωματωμένη σχάρα ποδηλάτου μεταφοράς; Τιμόνι; Σχάρα MIK HD; Βάση γρήγορης απασφάλισης; Πίσω σχάρα/βάση; Σωλήνας καθίσματος; Σφιγκτήρας παλουκόσελου; Λαιμός/σωλήνας πιρουνιού; Άνω σωλήνας/μέσο πλαισίου; Άλλο
da: Monteringstype for børnesæde: Integreret bagagebærer til ladcykel; Styr; MIK HD-bagagebærer; Quick-release-beslag; Bagagebærer; Sadelrør; Sadelpindsklampe; Styrrør/frempind; Overrør/midterstel; Andet
it: Tipo di montaggio del seggiolino per bambini: Portapacchi integrato per cargo bike; Manubrio; Portapacchi MIK HD; Staffa a sgancio rapido; Portapacchi posteriore; Piantone della sella; Morsetto reggisella; Cannotto/attacco manubrio; Tubo orizzontale/telaio centrale; Altro
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งที่นั่งเด็ก: แร็กจักรยานคาร์โก้แบบในตัว; แฮนด์บาร์; แร็ก MIK HD; ขายึดแบบปลดเร็ว; แร็ก/ตะแกรงท้าย; ท่อนั่ง; รัดหลักอาน; ซาง/สเต็ม; ท่อบน/กลางเฟรม; อื่นๆ
en: Child seat mounting type: Cargo bike integrated rack; Handlebar; MIK HD rack; Quick-release bracket; Rear rack/carrier; Seat tube; Seatpost clamp; Steerer/stem; Top tube/mid-frame; Other
pl: Typ mocowania fotelika dziecięcego: Zintegrowany bagażnik roweru cargo; Kierownica; Bagażnik MIK HD; Wspornik z szybkozłączką; Bagażnik tylny; Rura podsiodłowa; Zacisk sztycy; Rura sterowa / mostek; Górna rura / środek ramy; Inne
ro-RO: Tip de montare a scaunului pentru copii: Portbagaj integrat bicicletă cargo; Ghidon; Portbagaj MIK HD; Suport cu eliberare rapidă; Portbagaj/suport spate; Tubul șeii; Colier tijă de șa; Tub direcție/pipă; Tub superior/mijlocul cadrului; Altele
nl: Kinderzitje montagetype: Geïntegreerde drager bakfiets; Stuur; MIK HD-drager; Quick-release-beugel; Achterdrager; Zitbuis; Zadelpenklem; Stuurbuis/stuurpen; Bovenbuis/middenframe; Overig
hr-HR: Vrsta montaže dječje sjedalice: Integrirani nosač za teretni bicikl; Upravljač; MIK HD nosač; Nosač za brzo otpuštanje; Stražnji nosač; Cijev sjedala; Obujmica cijevi sjedala; Cijev vilice / lula; Gornja cijev / sredina okvira; Ostalo
sv: Monteringstyp för barnstol: Integrerad pakethållare för lådcykel; Styre; MIK HD-pakethållare; Snabbfäste; Pakethållare bak; Sadelrör; Sadelstolpsklämma; Styrrör/styrstam; Överrör/mitt på ramen; Övrigt
es: Tipo de montaje del asiento infantil: Portaequipajes integrado para bicicleta de carga; Manillar; Portaequipajes MIK HD; Soporte de liberación rápida; Portaequipajes trasero; Tubo del asiento; Abrazadera del tubo del asiento; Tubo de dirección/potencia; Tubo superior/cuadro medio; Otro
nb: Monteringstype for barnesete: Integrert stativ for lastesykkel; Styre; MIK HD-stativ; Hurtigkoblingsbrakett; Bagasjebrett; Seterør; Setepinneklemme; Gaffelrør/styrestem; Overrør / midtramme; Annet
cs: Typ montáže dětské sedačky: Integrovaný nosič pro cargo kolo; Řídítka; Nosič MIK HD; Rychloupínací držák; Zadní nosič; Sedlová trubka; Objímka sedlovky; Sloupek vidlice / představec; Horní rámová trubka / střed rámu; Jiný